Utah statutes.
41-6a-201.   Chapter relates to vehicles on highways -- Exceptions.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways, except:

(1) when a different place is specifically identified; or

(2)  under the provisions of Section 41-6a-210, Part 4, Accident Responsibilities, and Part 5, Driving Under the Influence and Reckless Driving, which apply upon highways and elsewhere throughout the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

